Washington statutes.
RCW 35.74.040

Required specifications.

All bridges constructed under the provisions of this chapter must be so constructed as not to obstruct navigation, and must have a draw or swing of sufficient space or span to permit the safe, convenient, and expeditious passage at all times of any steamer or vessel or raft which may navigate the stream or waters bridged.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.74.040. Prior: 1890 p 55 s 5; RRS s 9327.]